Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1057
Telecommunications relay services, defined.

Telecommunications relay services has the same meaning as in 47 C.F.R. 9.3, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2024.

Laws 2024, LB1031, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1024.01;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 39.